Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-1208
Boundary change; petition; contents.

Petitions to the State Board of Education to change educational service unit boundaries shall include a description of the proposed boundaries and shall be accompanied by a plan of reorganization which shall include (1) a summary of the reasons for the proposed reorganization, (2) a plan for the provision of services to school districts affected by any reorganization plan, (3) when a petition proposes the dissolution of an entire educational service unit or units for attachment to an existing educational service unit or for the merger of two or more educational service units into a new educational service unit, a summary of the terms on which such reorganization is made, including provision for the utilization of existing facilities, equipment, and materials and provision for the disposition of assets and any unbonded indebtedness of affected educational service units, (4) when a petition deals with the attachment of new territory to an existing educational service unit, verification of approval by majority vote of the receiving educational service unit governing board, and (5) a plan for the establishment of new election districts as required under section 79-1217.

Laws 1987, LB 688, § 4;

Laws 1990, LB 486, § 2;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-2202.05;

Laws 1996, LB 900, § 925;

Laws 2007, LB603, § 11.